Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Reimbursement Under Medical Service Contract or DisabilityInsurance Policy

§ 26-22-101.
Reimbursement for health services provided by licensed practitioner or registered dietitian not to be denied.

Notwithstanding any provision of any medical service contract or policy of disability insurance or certificate to the contrary if a medical service contract or insurance policy or certificate provides for reimbursement to the insured or subscriber for health services, reimbursement in amounts provided under the contract or insurance policy shall not be denied if the services are rendered to the insured or subscriber by a person licensed under the laws of this state to treat the illness or disability or perform the health services covered by the contract or policy. Nothing in this section prevents the insured from contracting with the insurer for direct payment of policy proceeds to the provider of health services.

For purposes of reimbursements provided by subsection (a) of this section for dietary services, a dietitian registered with the commission on dietetic registration of the American dietetic association shall be deemed a “person licensed” within the meaning of subsection (a) and benefits otherwise provided by the contract shall be provided. Nothing in this section shall require a disability insurer to pay for services provided by a dietitian or a registered dietitian unless otherwise provided as a benefit in the contract or policy.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 268, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-453.4; W.S. 1977, §

26-25-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1991, ch. 79, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Priority and apportionment of liability between medical and hospital expense insurers, 25 ALR4th 1022.

§ 26-22-102.
Requirements of accident and sickness insurance to tax supported institutions.

No individual or group policy of accident and sickness insurance delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state which provides coverage for mental illness or intellectual disability or both shall exclude benefits for the care or treatment of the mental illness or intellectual disability provided by a tax supported institution of the state, provided:

The institution establishes and actively utilizes appropriate professional standard review organizations according to W.S.

35-17-101

, or comparable peer review programs;

The operation of the institution is subject to review according to federal and state law; and

Charges are made for the services.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 162, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-453.5; W.S. 1977, §

26-25-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” twice in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes mental illness or disorder, insanity, or the like, within provision limiting or excluding coverage under health or disability policy, 19 ALR5th 533.

§ 26-22-103.
Applicability; compliance by use of endorsements or riders.

W.S.

26-22-102

and this section apply to all accident and sickness policies issued and delivered in the state or issued for delivery in the state after January 1, 1976, but do not apply to any policies issued and delivered in the state or issued for delivery in the state prior to that date. With respect to any policy forms approved by the insurance commission prior to January 1, 1976, an insurer is authorized to achieve compliance by the use of endorsements or riders if the endorsements or riders are approved by the insurance commission as being in compliance with W.S.

26-22-102

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 162, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-453.6; W.S. 1977, §

26-25-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-22-104.
Reimbursement for health care; includes health care by psychologists.

Notwithstanding any provisions in policies or contracts or certificates issued as evidence thereof which might be construed to the contrary, from and after July 1, 1985, all individual and group or blanket policies of accident and sickness insurance or individual or group service or indemnity contracts issued by a corporation including corporations which provide health care to its employees as a benefit of employment which are issued, delivered, issued for delivery, amended or renewed in this state or which cover any risk resident, located or to be performed in this state and which provide coverage for diagnostic and therapeutic services which are within the lawful scope of practice of a psychologist duly licensed to practice, shall be deemed to provide that any person covered under the policies or contracts is entitled to receive reimbursement for the services under the policies or contracts if they are rendered by a duly licensed doctor of medicine or a duly licensed psychologist.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 45, § 1.